Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.007

Joint committee on employment relations—Members—Purpose—Rules—Meetings.

(1) A joint committee on employment relations is established, composed of the following members:

(a) Two members with leadership positions in the house of representatives, representing each of the two largest caucuses;

(b) The chair and ranking minority member of the house appropriations committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses;

(c) Two members with leadership positions in the senate, representing each of the two largest caucuses;

(d) The chair and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee, or its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses; and

(e) One nonvoting member, appointed by the governor, representing the office of financial management.

(2) The committee shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson.

(3) The governor or a designee shall convene meetings of the committee. The committee must meet at least six times, generally every two months, for the purpose of consulting with the governor or the governor's designee and institutions of higher education on matters related to collective bargaining with state employees conducted under the authority of this chapter and chapters 41.56, 47.64, and 74.39A RCW. The governor or the governor's designee or the institution of higher education may not share internal bargaining notes.

(4) In years when master collective bargaining agreements are negotiated, the committee must meet prior to the start of bargaining to identify goals and objectives for public employee collective bargaining that the governor may take into consideration during negotiations.

(5) One meeting must be convened following the governor's budget submittal to the legislature to consult with the committee regarding the appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreements and to advise the committee on the elements of the agreements and on any legislation necessary to implement the agreements.

(6) The committee shall, by a majority of the members, adopt rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate, including reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the committee, ensuring reasonable advance notice of each meeting, and providing for the right of the public to attend each such meeting with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and confidential information used or to be used in collective bargaining, including the specific details of bargaining proposals.

(7) The committee may, by a majority of the members, meet more or less frequently. A quorum of the joint committee is not required for the meeting to take place. Meetings may take place by conference telephone or similar communications equipment so that all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time. Participation by that method constitutes presence in person at a meeting.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 23 s 2.]